Utah statutes.
17-18a-203.   District attorney powers and functions.

In a county that is located within a prosecution district, the district attorney:

(1)  is a public prosecutor for the county; and

(2)  shall perform each public prosecutor duty in accordance with this chapter or as otherwise required by law.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

